src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON MK-long !!= * @CODE@ :mõõ :ǩeä
+Sg+Acc:n	K ;
+Sg+Gen:n	K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:nn	K ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:nn	K ;
+Sg+Ill:zz	K ;
+Sg+Abe:ntää K ;
+Pl+Nom:k	K ;
+Pl+Gen:i   K ;

LEXICON MK-short !!= * @CODE@ :mõ :ǩeä
+Sg+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i K ;
+Sg+Com+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:in	K ;
+Sg+Abe+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:ntää	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹd	K ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹd	K ;
+Pl+Loc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:in	K ;
+Pl+Com:ivuiʹm	K ;
+Pl+Abe:itää	K ;

LEXICON M-low-short !!= * @CODE@ :mâ
MK-low-short ;
+Pl+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i K ;
+Pl+Acc:iʹd	K ;
+Pl+Ill:iʹd	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹdd	K ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹdd	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth-no-q:id K ;
+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth-no-q:id K ;

LEXICON K-low-short !!= * @CODE@ :ǩeä
MK-low-short ;
+Pl+Acc:id	K ;
+Pl+Ill:id	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:idd	K ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:idd	K ;

LEXICON MK-low-short !!= * @CODE@ :mâ :ǩeä
+Sg+Loc:ʹst K ;
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth-no-q:st K ;
+Sg+Com:in	K ;
+Pl+Loc:in	K ;
+Sg+Com+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹnn	K ;
+Pl+Loc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹnn	K ;

LEXICON MK-low-long !!= * @CODE@ :mââ :ǩeä
+Ess:ʹđen	K ;
+Par:ʹđ	K ;
+Par:ʹđed	K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:ivuiʹm	K ;
+Pl+Abe+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:itää	K ;



LEXICON INDEF-MK !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Nom:ii-ne	K ;

LEXICON INDEF-MK-long !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Acc:n-ne	K ;
+Sg+Gen:n-ne	K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:nn-ne	K ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:nn-ne	K ;
+Sg+Ill:zz-ne	K ;
+Sg+Abe:n-ne-tää	K ;
+Pl+Nom:k-ne	K ;
+Pl+Gen:i-ne   K ;

LEXICON INDEF-MK-short !!= * @CODE@ :mõ :ǩeä
+Sg+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i-ne K ;
+Sg+Com+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:in-ne	K ;
+Sg+Abe+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:n-ne-tää	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹd-ne	K ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹd-ne	K ;
+Pl+Loc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:in-ne	K ;
+Pl+Com:i-ne-vuiʹm	K ;
+Pl+Abe:i-ne-tää	K ;


LEXICON INDEF-M-low-short !!= * @CODE@ :mâ
INDEF-MK-low-short ;
+Pl+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i-ne K ;
+Pl+Acc:iʹd-ne	K ;
+Pl+Ill:iʹd-ne	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹdd-ne	K ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹdd-ne	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth-no-q:id-ne K ;
+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth-no-q:id-ne K ;

LEXICON INDEF-K-low-short !!= * @CODE@ :ǩeä
INDEF-MK-low-short ;
+Pl+Acc:id-ne	K ;
+Pl+Ill:id-ne	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:idd-ne	K ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:idd-ne	K ;

LEXICON INDEF-MK-low-short !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Loc:ʹst-ne K ; 
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth-no-q:st-ne K ;
+Sg+Com:in-ne	K ;
+Pl+Loc:in-ne	K ;
+Sg+Com+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹnn-ne	K ;
+Pl+Loc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹnn-ne	K ;

LEXICON INDEF-MK-low-long !!= * @CODE@
+Ess:ʹđen-ne	K ;
+Par:ʹđ-ne	K ;
+Par:ʹđed-ne	K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i-ne-vuiʹm	K ;
+Pl+Abe+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i-ne-tää	K ;



LEXICON DISTR-MK !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Nom:ii-a	K ;

LEXICON DISTR-MK-long !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Acc:n-a	K ;
+Sg+Gen:n-a	K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:nn-a	K ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:nn-a	K ;
+Sg+Ill:zz-a	K ;
+Sg+Abe:n-a-tää	K ;
+Pl+Nom:k-a	K ;
+Pl+Gen:i-a   K ;

LEXICON DISTR-MK-short !!= * @CODE@ :mõ :ǩeä
+Sg+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i-a K ;
+Sg+Com+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:in-a	K ;
+Sg+Abe+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:n-a-tää	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹd-a	K ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹd-a	K ;
+Pl+Loc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:in-a	K ;
+Pl+Com:i-a-vuiʹm	K ;
+Pl+Abe:i-a-tää	K ;

LEXICON DISTR-M-low-short !!= * @CODE@ :mâ
DISTR-MK-low-short ;
+Pl+Gen+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i-a K ;
+Pl+Acc:iʹd-a	K ;
+Pl+Ill:iʹd-a	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹdd-a	K ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹdd-a	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth-no-q:id-a K ;
+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth-no-q:id-a K ;

LEXICON DISTR-K-low-short !!= * @CODE@ :ǩeä
DISTR-MK-low-short ;
+Pl+Acc:id-a	K ;
+Pl+Ill:id-a	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:idd-a	K ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:idd-a	K ;

LEXICON DISTR-MK-low-short !!= * @CODE@
+Sg+Loc:ʹst-a K ; 
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth-no-q:st-a K ;
+Sg+Com:in-a	K ;
+Pl+Loc:in-a	K ;
+Sg+Com+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹnn-a	K ;
+Pl+Loc+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:iʹnn-a	K ;

LEXICON DISTR-MK-low-long !!= * @CODE@
+Ess:ʹđen-a	K ;
+Par:ʹđ-a	K ;
+Par:ʹđed-a	K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i-a-vuiʹm	K ;
+Pl+Abe+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i-a-tää	K ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT_
+Qnt: # ; ! THIS NEEDS FIXING.2018-01-10

!! ### SPATIAL PRONOUNS
LEXICON PRON_SPAT_SG1_
+Sem/Plc+Sg1: K ;
LEXICON PRON_SPAT_SG2_
+Sem/Plc+Sg2: K ;
!LEXICON PRON_SPAT_SG3_
!+Pron+Sem/Plc+Sg3: K ;
LEXICON PRON_SPAT_PL1_
+Sem/Plc+Pl1: K ;
LEXICON PRON_SPAT_PL2_
+Sem/Plc+Pl2: K ;
LEXICON PRON_SPAT_PL3_
+Sem/Plc+Pl3: K ;

!LEXICON PRON_SPAT_SG1-ILL_
!+Pron+Sem/Plc+Sg1+Ill: K ;
!LEXICON PRON_SPAT_SG2-ILL_
!+Pron+Sem/Plc+Sg2+Ill: K ;
!LEXICON PRON_SPAT_SG3-ILL_
!+Pron+Sem/Plc+Sg3+Ill: K ;
!LEXICON PRON_SPAT_PL1-ILL_
!+Pron+Sem/Plc+Pl1+Ill: K ;
!LEXICON PRON_SPAT_PL2-ILL_
!+Pron+Sem/Plc+Pl2+Ill: K ;
!LEXICON PRON_SPAT_PL3-ILL_
!+Pron+Sem/Plc+Pl3+Ill: K ;

!LEXICON PRON_SPAT_SG1-LOC_
!+Pron+Sem/Plc+Sg1+Loc: K ;
!LEXICON PRON_SPAT_SG2-LOC_
!+Pron+Sem/Plc+Sg2+Loc: K ;
!LEXICON PRON_SPAT_SG3-LOC_
!+Pron+Sem/Plc+Sg3+Loc: K ;
!LEXICON PRON_SPAT_PL1-LOC_
!+Pron+Sem/Plc+Pl1+Loc: K ;
!LEXICON PRON_SPAT_PL2-LOC_
!+Pron+Sem/Plc+Pl2+Loc: K ;
!LEXICON PRON_SPAT_PL3-LOC_
!+Pron+Sem/Plc+Pl3+Loc: K ;

!! ### MISC
LEXICON PRON_DWWT
+Det+Sg+Nom:t K ;
+Det+Sg+Ill:zze K ;
+Det+Sg+Ill:zz K ;
+Det+Ess:đen K ;
+Det+Par:đed K ;
+Det+Sg+Gen:n K ;
+Det+Sg+Loc:ʹst K ;
+Det+Pl+Nom:k K ;

LEXICON Indefinite !!= * @CODE@
mii-ne+Pron+Indef:m       INDEF-MK ;
ǩii-ne+Pron+Indef:ǩ       INDEF-MK ;
mii-ne+Pron+Indef:mõõ     INDEF-MK-long ;
ǩii-ne+Pron+Indef:ǩeä     INDEF-MK-long ;
mii-ne+Pron+Indef:mõ      INDEF-MK-short ;
ǩii-ne+Pron+Indef:ǩeä     INDEF-MK-short ;
mii-ne+Pron+Indef:mââ     INDEF-MK-low-long ;
ǩii-ne+Pron+Indef:ǩeä     INDEF-MK-low-long ;
mii-ne+Pron+Indef:mâ      INDEF-M-low-short ;
ǩii-ne+Pron+Indef:ǩeä     INDEF-K-low-short ;
LEXICON Distributive !!= * @CODE@
mii-a+Pron+Distr:m       DISTR-MK ;
ǩii-a+Pron+Distr:ǩ       DISTR-MK ;
mii-a+Pron+Distr:mõõ     DISTR-MK-long ;
ǩii-a+Pron+Distr:ǩeä     DISTR-MK-long ;
mii-a+Pron+Distr:mõ      DISTR-MK-short ;
ǩii-a+Pron+Distr:ǩeä     DISTR-MK-short ;
mii-a+Pron+Distr:mââ     DISTR-MK-low-long ;
ǩii-a+Pron+Distr:ǩeä     DISTR-MK-low-long ;
mii-a+Pron+Distr:mâ      DISTR-M-low-short ;
ǩii-a+Pron+Distr:ǩeä     DISTR-K-low-short ;
